District of Columbia statutes.
29-1010.08

Liability for improper distributions; limitation of action.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, if a director of a limited cooperative association consents to a distribution made in violation of § 29-1010.07 and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with § 29-1008.18, the director is personally liable to the association for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount which could have been distributed without violating § 29-1010.07.

(b)

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution was made in violation of § 29-1010.07 shall be personally liable to the limited cooperative association to the extent the distribution exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid.

(c)

A director against whom an action is commenced under subsection (a) of this section may implead in the action any:

(1)

Other person who is liable under subsection (a) of this section and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person; and

(2)

Person that receives a distribution in violation of subsection (b) of this section and may seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation [of] subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

An action under this section shall be barred if it is commenced later than 2 years after the distribution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(6)(B), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote (a); substituted “person that receives” for “member or transferee of financial rights which received” in (b); and rewrote (c).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1008 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.